Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ga_IE.aff
SFX A Y 77
SFX A   im    nn          [^ui]aim
SFX A   0     id          [^ui]aim
SFX A   im    dh          [^ui]aim
SFX A   aim   faidh       [^uif]aim
SFX A   aim   faimid      [^uif]aim
SFX A   aim   far         [^uif]aim
SFX A   m     gí          [^ui]aim
SFX A   0     is          [^ui]aim
SFX A   m     dís         [^ui]aim
SFX A   aim   tar         [^euthi]aim
SFX A   m     dh          faim
SFX A   im    r           faim
SFX A   im    r           taim
SFX A   aim   tar         [^t]haim
SFX A   haim  ar          thaim
SFX A   im    nn          [oáóú]im
SFX A   0     id          [oáóú]im
SFX A   m     tear        [oáóú]im
SFX A   im    dh          [oáóú]im
SFX A   im    faidh       [oáóú]im
SFX A   im    faimid      [oáóú]im
SFX A   im    far         [oáóú]im
SFX A   m     gí          [oáóú]im
SFX A   m     dís         [oáóú]im
SFX A   0     is          [oáóú]im
SFX A   im    nn          [iu]aim
SFX A   0     id          [iu]aim
SFX A   m     tear        [iu]aim
SFX A   im    dh          [iu]aim
SFX A   im    faidh       [iu]aim
SFX A   im    faimid      [iu]aim
SFX A   im    far         [iu]aim
SFX A   m     gí          [iu]aim
SFX A   0     is          [iu]aim
SFX A   m     dís         [iu]aim
SFX A   aim   itear       eaim
SFX A   im    eann        [^aoáéóú]im
SFX A   0     id          [^aoáéóú]im
SFX A   im    eadh        [^aoáéóú]im
SFX A   im    fidh        [^aoáéóú]im
SFX A   im    fimid       [^aoáéóú]im
SFX A   im    fear        [^aoáéóú]im
SFX A   m     gí          [^aoáéóú]im
SFX A   0     is          [^aoáéóú]im
SFX A   m     dís         [^aoáéóú]im
SFX A   im    tear        [^aoáéóúth]im
SFX A   im    ear         tim
SFX A   im    tear        [^t]him
SFX A   him   ear         thim
SFX A   im    ann         éim
SFX A   0     id          éim
SFX A   m     tear        éim
SFX A   im    adh         éim
SFX A   m     fidh        éim
SFX A   m     fimid       éim
SFX A   m     fear        éim
SFX A   m     gí          éim
SFX A   0     is          éim
SFX A   m     dís         éim
SFX A   m     onn         ím
SFX A   m     mid         ím
SFX A   m     odh         ím
SFX A   m     fidh        ím
SFX A   m     fimid       ím
SFX A   m     fear        ím
SFX A   m     gí          ím
SFX A   0     is          ím
SFX A   m     dís         ím
SFX A   ím    itear       [^aou]ím
SFX A   m     tear        aím
SFX A   ím    itear       [^l]oím
SFX A   m     tear        [ch]loím
SFX A   ím    itear       [^ch]loím
SFX A   ím    itear       [^bh]uím
SFX A   m     tear        buím
SFX A   ím    itear       [^b]huím
SFX A   m     tear        bhuím

SFX E Y 108
SFX E   inn   mar         [^iu]ainn
SFX E   inn   dh          [^iu]ainn
SFX E   nn    mis         [^iu]ainn
SFX E   nn    dís         [^iu]ainn
SFX E   ainn  fainn       [^iuf]ainn
SFX E   ainn  fá          [^iuf]ainn
SFX E   ainn  fadh        [^iuf]ainn
SFX E   ainn  faimis      [^iuf]ainn
SFX E   ainn  faidís      [^iuf]ainn
SFX E   ainn  faí         [^iuf]ainn
SFX E   inn   dar         [^iu]ainn
SFX E   ainn  tá          [^eutih]ainn
SFX E   ainn  taí         [^eutih]ainn
SFX E   ainn  á           [ft]ainn
SFX E   inn   í           [ft]ainn
SFX E   ainn  tá          [^t]hainn
SFX E   ainn  taí         [^t]hainn
SFX E   hainn á           thainn
SFX E   hainn aí          thainn
SFX E   inn   mar         [oáóú]inn
SFX E   nn    teá         [oáóú]inn
SFX E   inn   dh          [oáóú]inn
SFX E   nn    mis         [oáóú]inn
SFX E   nn    dís         [oáóú]inn
SFX E   nn    tí          [oáóú]inn
SFX E   inn   fainn       [oáóú]inn
SFX E   inn   fá          [oáóú]inn
SFX E   inn   fadh        [oáóú]inn
SFX E   inn   faimis      [oáóú]inn
SFX E   inn   faidís      [oáóú]inn
SFX E   inn   faí         [oáóú]inn
SFX E   inn   dar         [oáóú]inn
SFX E   inn   mar         [iu]ainn
SFX E   nn    teá         [iu]ainn
SFX E   inn   dh          [iu]ainn
SFX E   nn    mis         [iu]ainn
SFX E   nn    dís         [iu]ainn
SFX E   nn    tí          [iu]ainn
SFX E   inn   fainn       [iu]ainn
SFX E   inn   fá          [iu]ainn
SFX E   inn   fadh        [iu]ainn
SFX E   inn   faimis      [iu]ainn
SFX E   inn   faidís      [iu]ainn
SFX E   inn   faí         [iu]ainn
SFX E   inn   dar         [iu]ainn
SFX E   ainn  iteá        eainn
SFX E   ainn  ití         eainn
SFX E   inn   eamar       [^aoáéóú]inn
SFX E   inn   eadh        [^aoáéóú]inn
SFX E   nn    mis         [^aoáéóú]inn
SFX E   nn    dís         [^aoáéóú]inn
SFX E   inn   finn        [^aoáéóú]inn
SFX E   inn   feá         [^aoáéóú]inn
SFX E   inn   feadh       [^aoáéóú]inn
SFX E   inn   fimis       [^aoáéóú]inn
SFX E   inn   fidís       [^aoáéóú]inn
SFX E   inn   fí          [^aoáéóú]inn
SFX E   inn   eadar       [^aoáéóú]inn
SFX E   inn   teá         [^aoáéóúth]inn
SFX E   inn   tí          [^aoáéóúth]inn
SFX E   inn   eá          tinn
SFX E   inn   í           tinn
SFX E   inn   teá         [^t]hinn
SFX E   inn   tí          [^t]hinn
SFX E   hinn  eá          thinn
SFX E   hinn  í           thinn
SFX E   inn   amar        éinn
SFX E   nn    teá         éinn
SFX E   inn   adh         éinn
SFX E   nn    mis         éinn
SFX E   nn    dís         éinn
SFX E   nn    tí          éinn
SFX E   nn    finn        éinn
SFX E   nn    feá         éinn
SFX E   nn    feadh       éinn
SFX E   nn    fimis       éinn
SFX E   nn    fidís       éinn
SFX E   nn    fí          éinn
SFX E   inn   adar        éinn
SFX E   nn    omar        ínn
SFX E   nn    odh         ínn
SFX E   nn    mis         ínn
SFX E   nn    dís         ínn
SFX E   nn    finn        ínn
SFX E   nn    feá         ínn
SFX E   nn    feadh       ínn
SFX E   nn    fimis       ínn
SFX E   nn    fidís       ínn
SFX E   nn    fí          ínn
SFX E   nn    odar        ínn
SFX E   ínn   iteá        [^aou]ínn
SFX E   ínn   ití         [^aou]ínn
SFX E   nn    teá         aínn
SFX E   nn    tí          aínn
SFX E   ínn   iteá        [^l]oínn
SFX E   ínn   ití         [^l]oínn
SFX E   nn    teá         [ch]loínn
SFX E   nn    tí          [ch]loínn
SFX E   ínn   iteá        [^ch]loínn
SFX E   ínn   ití         [^ch]loínn
SFX E   ínn   iteá        [^bh]uínn
SFX E   ínn   ití         [^bh]uínn
SFX E   ínn   iteá        [^b]huínn
SFX E   ínn   ití         [^b]huínn
SFX E   nn    teá         bhuínn
SFX E   nn    tí          bhuínn
SFX E   nn    teá         buínn
SFX E   nn    tí          buínn

SFX C Y 20
SFX C   m     onn         aím
SFX C   0     id          aím
SFX C   m     tear        aím
SFX C   m     odh         aím
SFX C   aím   óidh        aím
SFX C   aím   óimid       aím
SFX C   aím   ófar        aím
SFX C   m     gí          aím
SFX C   0     is          aím
SFX C   m     dís         aím
SFX C   m     onn         [^a]ím
SFX C   0     id          [^a]ím
SFX C   m     tear        [^a]ím
SFX C   m     odh         [^a]ím
SFX C   ím    eoidh       [^a]ím
SFX C   ím    eoimid      [^a]ím
SFX C   ím    eofar       [^a]ím
SFX C   m     gí          [^a]ím
SFX C   0     is          [^a]ím
SFX C   m     dís         [^a]ím

SFX F Y 26
SFX F   nn    omar        aínn
SFX F   nn    teá         aínn
SFX F   nn    odh         aínn
SFX F   nn    mis         aínn
SFX F   nn    dís         aínn
SFX F   nn    tí          aínn
SFX F   aínn  óinn        aínn
SFX F   aínn  ófá         aínn
SFX F   aínn  ódh         aínn
SFX F   aínn  óimis       aínn
SFX F   aínn  óidís       aínn
SFX F   aínn  ófaí        aínn
SFX F   nn    odar        aínn
SFX F   nn    omar        [^a]ínn
SFX F   nn    teá         [^a]ínn
SFX F   nn    odh         [^a]ínn
SFX F   nn    mis         [^a]ínn
SFX F   nn    dís         [^a]ínn
SFX F   nn    tí          [^a]ínn
SFX F   ínn   eoinn       [^a]ínn
SFX F   ínn   eofá        [^a]ínn
SFX F   ínn   eodh        [^a]ínn
SFX F   ínn   eoimis      [^a]ínn
SFX F   ínn   eoidís      [^a]ínn
SFX F   ínn   eofaí       [^a]ínn
SFX F   nn    odar        [^a]ínn
