Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ga_IE.dic
aighním/UC
aighnínn/F
airgim/UA
airginn/E
aisdúichím/UC
aisdúichínn/F
aislingim/UA
aislinginn/E
amplaím/UC
amplaínn/F
aomaim/UA
aslonnaím/UC
aslonnaínn/F
ataispeánaim/UA
ataispeánainn/E
athchraolaim/UA
athchruthaím/UC
athchruthaínn/F
athghinim/UA
athghininn/E
athleasaím/UC
athleasaínn/F
athoilim/UA
athscríobhaim/UA
athscríobhainn/E
atitim/HMDBUA
bacaím/USC
baistim/USA
barrtheilgim/USA
beannaím/USC
bhacaínn/FU
bhaistinn/EU
bheannaínn/FU
bhlaisinn/EU
bholaínn/FU
bhroicinn/EU
bhruithnínn/FU
bhuínn/EU
blaisféimim/USA
bolaím/USC
bolgaim/USA
brisim/USA
bruithním/USC
bréanaim/USA
buiséadaim/USA
cailcím/USC
caillim/USA
caolaím/USC
cartaim/USA
ceartaím/USC
ceolaim/USA
chailcínn/FU
chaolaínn/FU
chasainn/EU
cheartaínn/FU
chleachtainn/EU
chleitínn/FU
chnaínn/EU
chognaínn/FU
chomardaínn/FU
chomhairinn/EU
chomhghreamaínn/FU
chomhthitinn/EU
chonlaínn/FU
chreidiúnaínn/FU
chrithinn/EU
chríochnaínn/FU
chumainn/EU
chumhdaínn/FU
chónaínn/FU
chúléistinn/EU
claonaim/USA
cleitím/USC
cluichim/USA
cnapaim/USA
cognaím/USC
coimhéadaim/USA
colaim/USA
comardaím/USC
comhfháiscim/USA
comhghreamaím/USC
comhshóim/USA
conlaím/USC
craobhscaoilim/USA
creidiúnaím/USC
crinnim/USA
cruanaim/USA
críochnaím/USC
cuirim/USA
cumhdaím/USC
cóimheasaim/USA
cónaím/USC
cúltortaim/USA
d'aerthriomaínn/FU
d'ainlínn/FU
d'aisghairinn/EU
d'aithisínn/FU
d'aothaínn/FU
d'atainn/EU
d'athbhreoslaínn/FU
d'atheagraínn/FU
d'athghairinn/EU
d'athscinninn/EU
d'athshlánaínn/FU
d'easanálaínn/FU
d'easbhrúinn/EU
d'fhachtóirínn/F
d'fheacainn/E
d'fheisínn/F
d'fhoghraínn/F
d'fhoirceannainn/E
d'fhorleathnaínn/F
d'fhoroinninn/E
d'fhrasaínn/F
d'fhuirsinn/E
d'fhuirínn/F
d'fhóirdheonaínn/F
d'ibhinn/EU
d'impínn/FU
d'imscaoilinn/EU
d'insealbhaínn/FU
d'ionaclaínn/FU
d'ionsáinn/EU
d'ocsaídínn/FU
d'osnaínn/FU
d'uiscínn/FU
d'urscaoilinn/EU
d'árachaínn/FU
dathaím/USC
dearmadaim/USA
deonaím/USC
dhallainn/EU
dhamnaínn/FU
dhiúracainn/EU
dhiúscraínn/FU
dhualainn/EU
dhíchollaínn/FU
dhíonainn/EU
dhúblaínn/FU
diúlaim/USA
doiciméadaím/USC
drannaim/USA
dualaim/USA
dí-ocsaídím/USC
díchuirim/USA
díchumasaím/USC
díolaimím/USC
díonaim/USA
díshiocaim/USA
dúshaothraím/USC
easmailim/UA
easmailinn/E
eispéirím/UC
eisteilgim/UA
faobhraím/USC
feadaim/USA
fhaillínn/FU
fheadainn/EU
fhoinsínn/FU
fholainn/EU
fhorscríobhainn/EU
fhrithghníomhaínn/FU
fhágainn/EU
fiaraim/USA
fiosraím/USC
foirmím/USC
folaim/USA
forordaím/USC
forscríobhaim/USA
fréamhaím/USC
fágaim/USA
fánaím/USC
galbhánaím/USC
gannmheasaim/USA
ghairdínn/FU
ghannmheasainn/EU
ghlaeainn/EU
ghníomhachtaínn/FU
ghortghlanainn/EU
gháirinn/EU
giorraím/USC
glaeaim/USA
gormaím/USC
gortghlanaim/USA
gualaím/USC
gáirim/USA
iartharaínn/F
idirdhuillím/UC
imchasaim/UA
imchasainn/E
inbhéartaím/UC
inscríobhaim/UA
inscríobhainn/E
insíothlaínn/F
iomadaím/UC
ionduchtaím/UC
lascainínn/F
leabhraím/C
leanaim/A
leanainn/E
lobhaim/A
lobhainn/E
locraím/C
luchtaínn/F
láimhsím/C
léim/A
léiminn/E
machnaím/SC
maolánaínn/F
maraím/SC
meallaim/SA
meallainn/E
meirbhlím/SC
mhaisínn/F
mheathainn/E
mheitibilínn/F
mháithrínn/F
mhórainn/E
mionscrúdaím/SC
monaplaínn/F
muinbhuailim/SA
muirním/SC
míminn/E
móidím/SC
neamhnínn/F
náisiúnaím/C
olltáirgim/UA
orlaím/UC
phaistéarainn/EU
pheacaínn/FU
phoncloiscinn/EU
podchraolaim/USA
poiblím/USC
píolótaím/USC
rannpháirtínn/F
rillim/A
riospráidím/C
rithinn/E
réamhshocraím/C
réamhíocaim/A
réscaipinn/E
rómhraínn/F
salaím/SC
saorghlanaim/SA
scaipinn/E
sceidealaim/A
sceonainn/E
sciomraím/C
sclóinim/A
scoirinn/E
scáthánaínn/F
scóigim/A
scórainn/E
seangaím/SC
sheachadainn/E
shealbhaínn/F
shlacainn/E
shnámhainn/E
shoirbhínn/F
shuínn/E
shíothlaínn/F
siofónainn/E
siséalaim/SA
slachtaím/SC
slíomainn/E
smeachaim/A
snámhainn/E
sochtaim/SA
soirbhím/SC
soirbhínn/F
spochainn/E
spriocaim/A
sreangaím/SC
srianainn/E
stalcaim/A
strompainn/E
stánaim/A
suaimhním/SC
suaimhnínn/F
síogainn/E
síoraím/SC
súim/SA
taisrím/USC
teannaim/USA
teanntaím/USC
thaisrínn/FU
tharmliginn/EU
thiontaínn/FU
thitinn/EU
thonnainn/EU
thráinn/EU
thréghalaínn/FU
thógainn/EU
tiontaím/USC
tnúthaim/USA
traochaim/USA
trasbhéarlaím/USC
tréghalaím/USC
tuaraim/USA
tílím/USC
uathoibrím/UC
uathoibrínn/F
ubhsceithim/UA
ábharaím/UC
éidím/UC
éidínn/F
éistinn/E
íospairim/UA
íslím/UC
